Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-814.06
Search warrant; issuance; original statement lost, destroyed, or unintelligible; effect.

If the original of the oral or telephonic statement, taken pursuant to section 29-814.02 or 29-814.03, shall be lost, destroyed, or a critical portion thereof is unintelligible, a search warrant issued pursuant to such oral or telephonic statement shall be deemed to be invalid.

Laws 1980, LB 731, § 6.